Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,284
Deceptive packaging of food; prohibited; deceptively packed or packaged, defined.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to deceptively pack or package any food or for any person to distribute, offer for sale, or sell any food that has been deceptively packed or packaged.

(2) A food shall be deemed to be deceptively packed or packaged if:

(a) Any substance has been added to, mixed with, or packed with the food so as to increase its bulk or weight, reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear to be better or of greater value than it actually is; or

(b) Any inferiority or damage to the food has been concealed in any manner.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 34;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.30;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 53;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 59.